Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2219
Deputies of ministerial officers; acts; effect.

Any duty enjoined by this code upon a ministerial officer, and any act permitted to be done by him, may be performed by his lawful deputy.

R.S.1867, Code § 893, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8568;

C.S.1922, § 9519;

C.S.1929, § 20-2220;

R.S.1943, § 25-2219.

Performance of duties of an office by a de facto incumbent gives him no claim to the official compensation. McCollough v. County of Douglas, 150 Neb. 389, 34 N.W.2d 654 (1948).

Deputy sheriff may conduct foreclosure sale. Richardson v. Hahn, 63 Neb. 294, 88 N.W. 527 (1901).

Deputy clerk may settle bill of exceptions, though clerk not absent. Brownell & Co. v. Fuller, 54 Neb. 586, 74 N.W. 1105 (1898).

Deputy sheriff may act for sheriff in appraising property. Nebraska Loan & Building Assn. v. Marshall, 51 Neb. 534, 71 N.W. 63 (1897).